Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.115

Rules to implement 1998 c 165.

The department of licensing may adopt rules as necessary to implement chapter 165, Laws of 1998.

[ 1998 c 165 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 165 ss 8-14: See note following RCW 46.52.070.

Short title—1998 c 165: See note following RCW 43.59.010.